California statutes. Public Resources Code
Of the funds made available by Section 91010, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the California Water Commission for projects under the Water Storage Investment Program. Priority for these funds and any funds returned to the commission shall be to support timely completion of existing approved projects by providing supplemental grants to reflect the increase in costs due to inflation since the
 original grant applications and any increase in public benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91016.

Of the funds made available by Section 91010, sixty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($62,500,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for capital investments in brackish desalination, contaminant and salt removal, and salinity management projects to improve California water and drought resilience. Priority shall be given to projects that use new incremental eligible renewable energy resources during operation and reduce greenhouse gas
 emissions associated with their construction and operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91017.

Of the funds made available by Section 91010, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Water Resources and the water board to improve water data management and to implement Section 144 of the Water Code to reactivate existing stream gages and deploy new gages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91018.

Of the funds made available by Section 91010, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Water Resources for competitive grants for regional conveyance projects or repairs to existing conveyances. Priority shall be given to projects that provide one or more of the following benefits:

(a) Improvements in regional or interregional water supply or water supply reliability.

(b) Increased groundwater recharge or mitigation of conditions of groundwater overdraft, salinity intrusion, water quality degradation, or subsidence.

(c) Adaptation to the impacts of hydrologic changes.

(d) Improvements in water security from drought, natural disasters, or other events that could interrupt water supplies.

(e) Providing safe drinking water for disadvantaged communities and economically distressed areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91019.

Of the funds made available by Section 91010, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Water Resources for projects that increase water conservation in agricultural and urban areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91020.

Of the funds made available by Section 91000, one billion one hundred forty million dollars ($1,140,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to reduce flood risk and improve stormwater management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91021.

Of the funds made available by Section 91020, five hundred fifty million dollars ($550,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and its departments, boards, and conservancies for flood management projects. Priority shall be given to projects designed and implemented to achieve both flood safety and ecosystem functions, while providing additional benefits. At least 40 percent of the allocation made pursuant to
 this section shall benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. Funding shall be allocated as follows:

(a) One hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be available for projects in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta to improve existing levees to increase flood protection and improve climate resiliency. For purposes of this subdivision, “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta” has the same meaning as described in Section 12220 of the Water Code.

(b) One hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be available for projects that implement the Flood Control Subventions Program.

(c) Two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) shall be available for projects related to the systemwide evaluation, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, expansion, or replacement
 of levees, weirs, bypasses, and facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91022.

Of the funds made available by Section 91020, four hundred eighty million dollars ($480,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Water Resources for the Dam Safety and Climate Resilience Local Assistance Program for competitive grants for projects that enhance dam safety and reservoir operations and protect public benefits pursuant to Section 6700 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91023.

Of the funds made available by Section 91020, one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the water board for grants for multiple-benefit urban stormwater management projects. Projects funded pursuant to this section shall address flooding in urbanized areas and provide multiple benefits, with preference given to natural infrastructure projects. Eligible stormwater projects shall include, but are not
 limited to, stormwater capture and reuse, planning and implementation of low-impact development, restoration of urban streams and watersheds, debris flow mitigation, and increasing permeable surfaces to help reduce flooding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91030.

Of the funds made available by Section 91000, six hundred five million dollars ($605,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to protect and restore rivers, lakes, and streams, and to improve watershed resilience, including the resilience of fish and wildlife within the watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91031.

Of the funds made available by Section 91030, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Water Resources for projects related to integrated regional water management to improve climate resilience on a watershed basis. The department shall update and revise the guidelines for the integrated regional water management program to address impacts associated with climate
 risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91032.

Of the funds made available by Section 91030, three hundred thirty-five million dollars ($335,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for projects that protect and restore rivers, wetlands, streams, lakes, and watersheds, and improve the resilience of fish and wildlife. Projects shall improve climate resilience, water supplies, or water quality. To the extent feasible, preference shall be given to natural infrastructure projects. At least
 40 percent of the allocation made pursuant to this section shall benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. The funds made available pursuant to this section shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600) for projects that improve the climate resiliency or the protection of the Los Angeles River Watershed or are consistent with the Lower Los Angeles River Revitalization Plan.

(b) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) for projects that improve the climate resiliency or the protection of the Los Angeles River Watershed and are a part of the revitalization plan developed by the Upper Los Angeles River and Tributaries Working Group pursuant to Section 33220 or
 the Los Angeles River Master Plan.

(c) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available to the Riverine Stewardship Program established pursuant to Section 7049 of the Water Code for projects that improve climate resiliency.

(d) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy for the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program.

(e) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available for multiple-benefit urban stream and river projects under the Urban Streams Restoration Program established pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code that protect and restore riparian habitats, improve climate resilience, enhance natural drainages, protect and restore watersheds, and provide public access.

(f) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for projects that improve conditions on wildlife refuges and wetland habitat areas. Projects may include the acquisition and delivery of water from willing sellers and water conveyance rights to achieve compliance with subsection (d) of Section 3406 of the federal Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Title 34 of Public Law 102-575) and the acquisition of water and conveyance rights for the Lower Klamath National Wildlife Refuge.

(g) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board for the Lower American River Conservancy Program.

(h) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy to protect and restore watersheds through the Coyote Valley Conservation Program in the County of Santa
 Clara.

(i) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy to protect and restore watersheds through the West Coyote Hills Program.

(j) (1) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available to the water board for loans or grants for projects that will address water quality problems arising in the California-Mexico cross-border rivers and coastal waters. Funds may be made available under this subdivision for water quality projects in the Tijuana River Valley Watershed, as described in the Tijuana River Plan created pursuant to Section 71107, and for projects consistent with the New River Water Quality, Public Health, and River Parkway Development Program, as described in Section 71103.6.

(2) Grants or loans awarded under this subdivision for
 projects located outside of California shall have a documented water quality benefit to California and its residents.

(3) Funding may be awarded to bilateral financial institutions as a state match pursuant to this subdivision only after federally committed funds have been secured and are available for expenditure on a one-to-one basis.

(k) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available to improve the climate resiliency of, or for the protection of, the Clear Lake Watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91033.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91030, one hundred seventy million dollars ($170,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to implement the Salton Sea Management Program 10-year Plan, and any subsequent revisions to that plan, or any subsequent plans, to provide air quality, public health, and habitat benefits.

(b) Of the funds made available by
 subdivision (a), ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available for either of the following:

(1) The creation of a Salton Sea Conservancy.

(2) The Salton Sea Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91040.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91000, one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Wildlife Conservation Board for projects pursuant to the guidelines of the Stream Flow Enhancement Program, including the acquisition of water or water rights, acquisition of land that includes water rights or contractual rights to water, and short- or long-term water transfers and
 leases.

(b) Of the funds made available by subdivision (a), fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board for the Habitat Enhancement and Restoration Program for fishery enhancement projects and programs that support reintroducing salmon into cold water habitat in the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers watersheds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91045.

Of the funds made available by Section 91000, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency for grants to nature and climate education and research facilities, nonprofit organizations and public institutions, natural history museums, California zoos and aquariums accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, and geologic heritage sites that serve diverse populations. Grants may
 be used for buildings, equipment, structures, and exhibit galleries that present collections to promote climate, biodiversity, and cultural literacy. Projects may support species recovery and biodiversity protection in order to advance the state’s 30x30 conservation goal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91050.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the Water Resilience Portfolio, California’s Water Supply Strategy, the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan, and the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6 of the Water Code), if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Wildfire and Forest Resilience [91500. - 91550.]

91500.

The sum of one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for wildfire prevention, including reducing community wildfire risk and restoring the health and resilience of forests and landscapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91510.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91500, one hundred thirty-five million dollars ($135,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Office of Emergency Services for a wildfire mitigation grant program. The Office of Emergency Services shall coordinate with the Department of Forestry and
 Fire Protection in administering these moneys. The grant program shall assist local and state agencies to leverage additional funds, including matching grants from federal agencies. Funds may be used to provide loans, rebates, direct assistance, and matching funds for projects that prevent wildfires, increase resilience, maintain existing wildfire risk reduction projects, reduce the risk of wildfires to communities, or increase home or community hardening. Projects shall benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, any of the
 following:

(1) Grants to local agencies, state agencies, joint powers authorities,
 nonprofit organizations, resource conservation districts, and tribes for projects that reduce wildfire risks to people and property consistent with an approved community wildfire protection plan.

(2) Grants to local agencies, state agencies, joint powers authorities, tribes, resource conservation districts, fire safe councils, and nonprofit organizations for structure hardening of critical community infrastructure, wildfire smoke mitigation, evacuation centers, including community clean air centers, structure hardening projects that reduce the risk of wildfire for entire neighborhoods and communities, water delivery system
 improvements for fire suppression purposes for communities in very high or high fire hazard areas, wildfire buffers, and incentives to remove structures that significantly
 increase hazard risk.

(3) Grants, in coordination with the Public Utilities Commission, to local agencies, state agencies, special districts, joint powers authorities, tribes, and nonprofit organizations for zero-emission backup power, energy storage, and microgrids for critical community infrastructure in order to provide continuity of electrical service, reduced wildfire ignitions, and to safeguard communities from disruption due to deenergization events, wildfire, or air pollution caused by wildfire, extreme heat, or other disaster.

(4) Grants under the Home Hardening Program to retrofit, harden, or create defensible space for homes at high risk of wildfire in order to protect California communities.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall prioritize
 wildfire mitigation grant funding applications from local agencies based on the Fire Risk Reduction Community list, pursuant to Section 4290.1.

(c) The Office of Emergency Services and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall provide technical assistance to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations, including those with access and functional needs, socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers, and economically distressed areas to ensure the grant program reduces the vulnerability of those most in need.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91520.

Of the funds made available by Section 91500, one billion two hundred five million dollars ($1,205,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and to its departments, boards, and conservancies for projects and grants to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands. Where appropriate, projects may include activities on lands owned by the United States. The
 funding made available by this section shall be allocated as follows:

(a) One hundred eighty-five million dollars ($185,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Conservation’s Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program to increase regional capacity to
 prioritize, develop, and implement projects that improve forest health and fire resilience, implement community fire preparedness demonstration projects, facilitate greenhouse gas emissions reductions, and increase carbon sequestration in forests and other landscapes across regions and throughout the state. The funding shall be allocated based, to the extent feasible, on the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.

(b) One hundred seventy million dollars ($170,000,000) shall be available to implement regional projects, including, but not limited to, landscape-scale projects developed by forest collaboratives as defined in Section 4810, projects developed by regional entities as defined
 in Section
 4208, and projects that implement strategies developed by state conservancies through block grants and direct appropriations by the Legislature.

(c) One hundred seventy-five million dollars ($175,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s Forest Health Program
 for long-term forest health projects, including improved forest management, prescribed fire, prescribed grazing, cultural fire, forest watershed restoration, reforestation, upper watershed, riparian, and mountain meadow restoration, and activities that promote long-term carbon storage and sequestration. Funds may be used for tribal wildfire resilience grants.

(d) One hundred eighty-five million dollars ($185,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for local fire prevention grants consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4124) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 and for grants to conduct workforce development for fire prevention and wildfire resiliency work. Workforce development grants may include, but are not limited to, the construction of designated housing for wildfire prevention workers.

(e) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for the creation or expansion of a fire training center.

(f) Two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Parks and Recreation for forest health and watershed improvement projects in forests and other habitats, including, but not limited to, redwoods, conifers, oak woodlands,
 mountain meadows, chaparral, and coastal forests. Projects shall involve the restoration of natural ecosystem functions in very high, high, and moderate fire hazard areas and may include prescribed fire, cultural fire, environmentally sensitive vegetation management, land protection, science-based fuel reduction, watershed protection, carbon sequestration, protection of older fire-resistant trees, or improved forest health.

(g) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available for grants to conduct fuel reduction, structure hardening, create defensible space, reforestation, or targeted acquisitions
 to improve forest health and fire resilience.

(h) Thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000) shall be available to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy for watershed improvement, forest health, biomass utilization,
 chaparral and forest restoration, and workforce development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(i) Twenty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($25,500,000) shall be available to the California Tahoe Conservancy for watershed improvement, forest health, biomass utilization, chaparral and forest restoration, and workforce development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable
 populations.

(j) Thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000) shall be available to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for watershed improvement, wildfire resilience, chaparral and forest restoration, and
 workforce
 development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(k) Thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy for watershed improvement, wildfire resilience,
 chaparral and forest restoration, and workforce development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(l) Thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000) shall be available to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for watershed improvement, wildfire resilience, chaparral and forest restoration, and workforce development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(m) Twenty-five
 million five hundred thousand dollars ($25,500,000) shall be available to the San Diego Rivers Conservancy for watershed improvement, wildfire resilience, chaparral and forest restoration, and workforce development that addresses needs related to this subdivision and is designed to create career pathways for individuals from disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(n) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available to the Wildfire Conservancy to improve firefighter health and safety, advance fire attack effectiveness, and promote community resilience and awareness.

(o) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available to the California Fire Foundation to support vegetation mitigation and fuels reduction projects, public education and outreach, personal protective equipment, specialized firefighting equipment, and
 firefighter health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91530.

Of the funds made available by Section 91500, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Conservation or State Energy Resources Conservation and Development
 Commission for projects in California that provide long-term capital infrastructure to use forest and other vegetative waste removed for wildfire mitigation for noncombustible uses that maximize reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, provide local air quality benefits, and increase local community resilience against climate change impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91535.

Of the funds made available by Section 91500, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for technologies that improve detection and assessment of new fire ignitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91540.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91500, thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for uses to reduce wildfire risk related to electricity transmission.

(b) The proportion of any asset funded pursuant to this section shall be funded without return on equity for the lifetime of the proportion of that asset that would have otherwise been borne by ratepayers.

(c) The proportion of any projects funded pursuant to this section shall be excluded from the ratebase, and no costs may be collected from ratepayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91545.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91500, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the California Conservation Corps or certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, and nonprofit workforce organizations for demonstrated jobs projects, including either of the following:

(1) Projects to mitigate unemployment and assist the state with the implementation of critical natural resources, transportation, energy, and housing infrastructure to promote climate resilience.

(2) Projects to prepare for, prevent, respond to, and rehabilitate following natural disasters, declared emergencies, or
 climate-related impacts to communities.

(b) At least 60 percent of the amount available pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available to certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5.

(c) Eligible workforce organizations include nonprofits, local agencies, and joint powers authorities that have programs that provide park and conservation employment training.

(d) The California Conservation Corps may expend the funds made available as grants to certified community conservation corps for purposes specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91550.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the California Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan, and by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Coastal Resilience [92000. - 92080.]

92000.

The sum of one billion two hundred million dollars ($1,200,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to increase coastal and ocean resiliency and to protect coastal lands, waters, communities, natural resources, and urban waterfronts from sea level rise and other climate impacts. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, projects to restore coastal wetlands and projects to address sea level
 rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92010.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 92000, four hundred fifteen million dollars ($415,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for projects identified by the State Coastal Conservancy for coastal resilience projects and
 programs, including, but not limited to, grants and expenditures to protect, restore, and increase the resilience of beaches, bays, coastal dunes, wetlands, coastal forests, watersheds, trails, and public access facilities. The funds made available pursuant to this section may be allocated to any of the following:

(1) Grants through the Climate Ready Program pursuant to Section 31113.

(2) Projects to protect coastal lands and restore habitats, including subtidal habitats, wetlands, riparian areas, redwood forests, grasslands, oak woodlands, and other important wildlife habitats, including projects to protect and restore healthy sea otter
 populations.

(3) Natural infrastructure projects that use existing natural areas to minimize coastal flooding, erosion, and runoff.

(4) Projects to restore coastal land for public uses on surplus land for formerly fossil-fueled powerplants.

(5) Projects for purposes of the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program established pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21.

(6) Lower cost coastal accommodation grants consistent with the Lower Cost Coastal Accommodations Program established pursuant to Section 31412.

(7) Projects that are consistent with the San Francisco Bay Restoration Authority Act (Title 7.25 (commencing with Section 66700) of the Government Code).

(b) Of the funds made available pursuant to subdivision (a), not less than eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for projects that are consistent with the San Francisco Bay Restoration Authority Act (Title 7.25 (commencing with Section 66700) of the Government Code) or the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program established pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21, including, but not limited to, projects that address sea level rise, flood management, and wetland restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92015.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Coastal Conservancy for the purpose of coastal and combined flood management projects and activities for developed shoreline areas, including areas with critical community infrastructure,
 including, but not limited to, transportation and port infrastructure at risk of current flooding and flooding due to sea level rise. Funds shall be allocated to multiple-benefit projects that improve public safety, including shoreline resilience projects designed to address flooding, sea level rise, and shoreline stability that include engineering with nature or nature-based features. These funds shall be available to local agencies as matching funds for federally funded coastal flood risk management and flood risk management projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92020.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, one hundred thirty-five million dollars ($135,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Ocean Protection Council for grants to increase resilience from the impacts of climate change. Preference shall be given to projects that conserve, protect, and restore marine wildlife and healthy ocean and coastal ecosystems, including, but not limited to, estuarine habitat, kelp forests, eelgrass meadows, and native oyster beds, or that maintain the state’s system of marine protected areas, and support sustainable fisheries. Funding may be used to purchase and install ocean current mapping infrastructure and new maritime research infrastructure to reduce emissions. The funds made available pursuant
 to this section may be used to establish a program with acre-based targets to advance habitat recovery projects that will contribute to protecting and restoring kelp forests, eelgrass meadows, and native oyster beds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 15.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Note: Added by Prop. 4 at the Nov. 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

92030.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to implement the California Sea Level Rise Mitigation and Adaptation Act of 2021 (Division 20.6.5 (commencing with Section 30970)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92040.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Parks and Recreation to implement the Sea Level Rise Adaptation Strategy to address the impacts of sea level rise in coastal state parks, support continued access and recreational opportunities, and protect coastal natural and cultural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92050.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Fish and Wildlife for all of the following:

(a) To protect and restore island ecosystems by mitigating the threat of island invasive species and advancing biosecurity initiatives.

(b) To advance climate-ready fisheries management by expanding opportunities for experimentation and adaptive cooperative management, modernizing electronic fisheries data management systems, and increasing the use of electronic technologies to facilitate more nimble decisionmaking and timely management responses under
 changing ocean conditions.

(c) To support the restoration and management of kelp ecosystems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92060.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants or expenditures to remove
 outdated or obsolete dams and for related water infrastructure. Projects may also increase climate resilience, enhance sediment supply, improve wildlife and fish passage, and modernize related water infrastructure, including related planning, monitoring, permitting, habitat restoration, and recreational improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92070.

Of the funds made available by Section 92000, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for hatchery upgrades and expansions and for new conservation hatcheries that increase fish production and include the latest technologies to support species conservation and reintroduction efforts necessary to support genetically diverse populations of Central Valley Chinook Salmon.
